Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 4

Interstate Nurse Licensure Compact

63-7-401. Short title.

This part may be known and cited as the “Nurse Licensure Compact.”

Acts 2016, ch. 591, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 591, § 3 provided that the state board of nursing is directed to inform the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission by letter of the effective dates for the new compact enacted by this act and the withdrawal from the old compact codified in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 7, Part 3. The state board of nursing informed the executive secretary of the Tennessee Code Commission that the effective date for the new compact and withdrawal from the old compact is January 19, 2018.

The lnterstate Nurse Licensure Compact, created by this section terminates June 30, 2028. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-249.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 591, § 3. January 19, 2018.